Hawaii statutes.
§607-24 No bonds or costs to be filed or
paid by government. Neither the State nor any county or any political
subdivision, board, or commission thereof, nor any officer, acting in the
officer's official capacity on behalf of the State or any county or other
political subdivision, board, or commission thereof, shall be taxed costs or
required to pay or make any deposit for the same or file any bond in any case
whether for costs, on motion for new trial, or on appeal, or for any other
purpose whatsoever. In all cases in which a final judgment or decree is
obtained against the State, county, or other political subdivision or any board
or commission thereof, any and all deposits for costs made by the prevailing
party shall be returned to the prevailing party, and the prevailing party shall
be reimbursed by the State, county, or other political subdivision, board, or
commission thereof, as the case may be, all actual disbursements, not including
attorney's fees or commissions, made by the prevailing party and approved by
the court. [L 1907, c 63, §1; RL 1925, §2546; am L 1933, c 212, §1; RL 1935,
§3795; am L 1937, c 126, §1; RL 1945, §9762; RL 1955, §219-23; HRS §607-24; am
L 1972, c 88, §5(w); gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 37(e), 54(d), 62(e).

Case Notes

Attorney's commissions and fees not chargeable against
Territory. 20 H. 112 (1910).

Costs not chargeable against public officers. 20 H. 359
(1911) (sheriff in habeas corpus). 21 H. 274 (1912) (sheriff in replevin). 20
H. 455 (1911); 23 H. 187 (1916) (superintendent of public works); not (prior to
am.) against county. 20 H. 112 (1910); 23 H. 524, 527 (1916).

Not applicable to bond on writ of error. 32 H. 111 (1931)
(former law).

Return of costs to successful plaintiff. 34 H. 245 (1937).

Section does not apply to the receiver of a national bank.
34 H. 308 (1937).

Not applicable to criminal prosecutions. 36 H. 546 (1943).

"Final judgment". 36 H. 603 (1943); 39 H. 1
(1950).

Where State is successful in condemning property under
chapter 101, condemnee is not "prevailing party" and cannot recover
"actual disbursements". 53 H. 582, 499 P.2d 663 (1972).

Where a prevailing party has "obtained" "a
final judgment" "against the State", the court may award the
prevailing party its "actual disbursements" pursuant to §607-9, this
section, and HRAP rule 39. 110 H. 269, 132 P.3d 378 (2006).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next